Maryland, session 2025, SB0385.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
21–901.3.
(a) In this section, “vulnerable individual” means:
(1) A pedestrian, including an individual who is lawfully:
(i) Actively working on a highway or a utility facility along a
highway;
(ii) Providing emergency services on a highway; or
(iii) On a sidewalk or footpath;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0385*

SENATE BILL 385
(2) An individual who is lawfully riding or leading an animal on a highway,
shoulder, crosswalk, or sidewalk; or
(3) An individual who is lawfully operating or riding any of the following
on a highway, shoulder, crosswalk, or sidewalk:
(i) A bicycle;
(ii) A farm tractor or farm equipment;
(iii) A play vehicle;
(iv) A motor scooter;
(v) A motorcycle;
(vi) An animal–drawn vehicle;
(vii) An EPAMD; or
(viii) A wheelchair.
(b) An individual may not cause the serious physical injury or death of a
vulnerable individual as a result of the individual operating a motor vehicle in violation of
any provision of this title.
(c) (1) An individual charged with a violation of subsection (b) of this section:
(i) Must appear in court; and
(ii) May not prepay the fine.
(2) An individual convicted of a violation of subsection (b) of this section is
subject to IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 2 MONTHS OR a fine not exceeding $2,000
OR BOTH.
(d) In addition to the penalties provided under subsection (c) of this section, the
court may order an individual convicted of a violation of subsection (b) of this section to:
(1) Participate in a motor vehicle safety course; and
(2) Perform up to 150 hours of community service.
(e) The Administration shall suspend the driver’s license of an individual
convicted of a violation of subsection (b) of this section for at least 7 days but not more than
6 months.

SENATE BILL 385 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.